Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.900

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 2 ss 1-6, 8-59, and 61-79.

Sections 1 through 6, 8 through 59, and 61 through 79, chapter 2, Laws of 1993 sp. sess. shall take effect March 1, 1994.

[ 1994 c 6 s 4; 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 102.]